Georgia statutes. 
Law reviews. - For article, "Judicial Review of Georgia Zoning: Cyclones and Doldrums in the Windmills of the Mind," see 2 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 97 (1986). For article, "Iguanas, Toads and Toothbrushes: Land-use Regulation of Art as Signage," see 25 Ga. L. Rev. 437 (1991). For annual survey on law of real property, see 43 Mercer L. Rev. 353 (1991). For annual survey article on local government law, see 50 Mercer L. Rev. 263 (1998). For annual survey of local government law, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 351 (2004).

For note, "Constitutional Barriers to Statewide Land Use Regulation in Georgia: Do They Still Exist?," see 3 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 249 (1987). For note on 1993 amendment of this chapter, see 10 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 166 (1993). For note on using inclusionary zoning techniques to promote affordable housing, see 44 Emory L.J. 359 (1995).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Unreasonableness of Zoning Restriction, 8 POF2d 53.

Special Damages Sufficient to Give Standing to Enjoin Zoning Violation, 1 POF3d 495.

Vested Right in Continuation of Zoning, 13 POF2d 373.

Zoning - Hardship Necessary for Zoning Variance, 23 POF3d 563.

Zoning - Invalidity of Single-Family Zoning Ordinance, 24 POF3d 543.

Zoning - Circumstances Warranting Relief from Zoning Enforcement, 25 POF3d 541.

Zoning - Circumstances Warranting Expansion of a Nonconforming Use, 26 POF3d 467.

Zoning: Proof of Unreasonableness of Aesthetic Regulation, 29 POF3d 491.

Zoning: Proof of Wrongful Land Use Pursuant to Section 1983, 30 POF3d 503.

Zoning: Proof of Inverse Condemnation from Excessive Land Use Regulation, 31 POF3d 563.

Zoning: Proof of Unreasonableness of Interim Zoning and Building Moratoria, 32 POF3d 485.

Zoning: Proof of Bias or Conflict of Interest in Zoning Decision, 32 POF3d 531.

Zoning: Validity of Home Occupation Accessory Use of Residential Property, 33 POF3d 459.

Zoning - Challenge to the Imposition of Development Exactions, 36 POF3d 417.

Zoning Action Not in Accordance With a Comprehensive Plan, 37 POF3d 383.

Challenge to Rezoning as Illegal Spot Zoning, 39 POF3d 433.

Change in Character of Neighborhood Necessary to Justify Rezoning, 41 POF3d 443.

Zoning: Circumstances Justifying Termination of Lawful Nonconforming Use, 44 POF3d 531.

Landowner's Right to Maintain Nonconforming Use Under Zoning Ordinance, 62 Am. Jur. Trials 1.

ALR. - Zoning: what constitutes "incidental" or "accessory" use of property zoned, and primarily used, for residential purposes, 54 A.L.R.4th 1034.

Change in area or location of nonconforming use as violation of zoning ordinance, 56 A.L.R.4th 769.

Zoning: what constitutes "incidental" or "accessory" use of property zoned, and primarily used, for business or commercial purposes, 60 A.L.R.4th 907.

Addition of another activity to existing nonconforming use as violation of zoning ordinance, 61 A.L.R.4th 724.

Change in volume, intensity, or means of performing nonconforming use as violation of zoning ordinance, 61 A.L.R.4th 806.

Change in type of activity of nonconforming use as violation of zoning ordinance, 61 A.L.R.4th 902.

Alteration, extension, reconstruction, or repair of nonconforming structure or structure devoted to nonconforming use as violation of zoning ordinance, 63 A.L.R.4th 275.

Zoning regulation of intoxicating liquor as pre-empted by state law, 65 A.L.R.4th 555.

Zoning: construction and effect of statute requiring that zoning application be treated as approved if not acted on within specified period of time, 66 A.L.R.4th 1012.

Zoning: residential off-street parking requirements, 71 A.L.R.4th 529.

Laches as defense in suit by governmental entity to enjoin zoning violation, 73 A.L.R.4th 870.

Validity of zoning laws setting minimum lot size requirements, 1 A.L.R.5th 622.

Construction and application of zoning laws setting minimum lot size requirements, 2 A.L.R.5th 553.

Activities in preparation for building as establishing valid nonconforming use or vested right to engage in construction for intended use, 38 A.L.R.5th 737.

36-66-1. Short title.

Statute text

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as "The Zoning Procedures Law."

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66-1, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1139, § 1.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article, "Local Government Law," see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 389 (2001). For article, "Local Government Litigation: Some Pivotal Principles," see 55 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2003). For survey article on local government law for the period from June 1, 2002 to May 31, 2003, see 55 Mercer L. Rev. 353 (2003). For annual survey of administrative law, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 31 (2004). For annual survey of local government law, see 58 Mercer L. Rev. 267 (2006). For annual survey on zoning and land use law, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 301 (2018). For annual survey on local government law, see 71 Mercer L. Rev. 189 (2019). For annual survey on zoning and land use law, see 71 Mercer L. Rev. 363 (2019).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Failure to address constitutional issue on part of trial court. - Trial court erred by failing to address whether a 1993 county zoning ordinance was constitutional because the record established that the landfill permit applicant raised a constitutional challenge to the zoning ordinance before the trial court in its response to the challengers' motion for partial summary judgment and, in fact, in its transfer order to the appellate court, the trial court specifically stated that the court did not rule on the applicant's constitutional argument. Southern States-Bartow County, Inc. v. Riverwood Farm Prop. Owners Ass'n, Inc., 331 Ga. App. 878, 769 S.E.2d 823 (2015).

Zoning ordinance properly enacted. - Evidence was sufficient to establish that the enactment of a county's zoning ordinance complied with the Georgia Zoning Procedures Law, O.C.G.A. § 36-66-1 et seq., when the board of commissioners adopted the zoning ordinance after the ordinance was read, a public meeting was held, changes to the proposed ordinance were made, and another public hearing was held at which the zoning map was available, and amendments to the zoning ordinance were approved pursuant to the zoning administrator's recommendations, a public meeting was held on the amendments, and the board then adopted the amendments without change. Mid-Georgia Envtl. Mgmt. Group, L.L.L.P. v. Meriwether County, 277 Ga. 670, 594 S.E.2d 344 (2004).

Superseded portions of ordinances need not be kept. - There is nothing in the Georgia Zoning Procedures Law, O.C.G.A. § 36-66-1 et seq., or the cases interpreting that law, that conditions validity of a zoning ordinance on the retention of superseded portions of the ordinance. Mid-Georgia Envtl. Mgmt. Group, L.L.L.P. v. Meriwether County, 277 Ga. 670, 594 S.E.2d 344 (2004).

Claim was time-barred. - Owner's failure to appeal the rezoning of a neighbor's property precluded the owner from attacking the rezoning decision under Spalding County, Ga., Unified Development Ordinance § 418 and O.C.G.A. § 5-3-20; a claim that Spalding County, Ga., Unified Development Ordinance § 414 did not comply with the Georgia Zoning Procedures Law, O.C.G.A. § 36-66-1 et seq., was also time-barred as any challenge to the rezoning had to be raised within 30 days. Hollberg v. Spalding County, 281 Ga. App. 768, 637 S.E.2d 163 (2006).

Failure to establish standing. - Dismissal of the appellants' petition for a writ of certiorari challenging the grant of a special use permit to the appellees was upheld because the appellants only alleged generally that the art farm would create noise, light, and traffic, and that it would decrease property values, without alleging how those effects would harm the appellants differently than other property owners in the area. Davis v. Rockdale Art Farm, Inc., 354 Ga. App. 82, 840 S.E.2d 160 (2020).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Validity of zoning regulations prohibiting or regulating removal or exploitation of oil and gas, including hydrofracking, 84 A.L.R.6th 133.

36-66-2. Legislative purpose; local government zoning powers.

Statute text

(a) While recognizing and confirming the authority of local governments to exercise zoning power within their respective territorial boundaries, it is the intention of this chapter to establish as state policy minimum procedures governing the exercise of that power. The purpose of these minimum procedures is to assure that due process is afforded to the general public when local governments regulate the uses of property through the exercise of the zoning power. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to invalidate any zoning decision made by a local government prior to January 1, 1986, or to require a local government to exercise its zoning power.

(b) Consistent with the minimum procedures required by this chapter, local governments may:

(1) Provide by ordinance or resolution for such administrative officers, bodies, or agencies as may be expedient for the efficient exercise of their zoning powers; and

(2) Provide by ordinance or resolution for procedures and requirements in addition to or supplemental to those required by this chapter.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66-2, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1139, § 1.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Procedural requirements of this chapter are mandatory. - County's failure to comply with the notice provisions of O.C.G.A. § 36-66-4(a) invalidated the subject zoning action. McClure v. Davidson, 258 Ga. 706, 373 S.E.2d 617 (1988).

County's failure to comply with the mandatory language of O.C.G.A. Ch. 66, T. 36 in enacting a zoning ordinance rendered the ordinance void. Tilley Properties, Inc. v. Bartow County, 261 Ga. 153, 401 S.E.2d 527 (1991).

No requirement that zoning power be exercised. - While the Georgia Public Service Commission (PSC) had the authority to regulate the placement of electrical substations, no requirement existed that every complex construction project be subject to zoning-like restrictions as an agency was not required to exercise the agency's zoning power under O.C.G.A. § 36-66-2(a); the broad statutory delegations of authority to the PSC did not specifically mention siting and did not provide sufficient objective standards to control the PSC's discretion so a trial court improperly directed the PSC to consider the propriety of a power company's construction of a substation and apply specific standards to the case. Ga. PSC v. Turnage, 284 Ga. 610, 669 S.E.2d 138 (2008).

Appeals. - Without express statutory language, a local government does not have the authority to create direct appeals of rezoning decisions. Walton County v. Scenic Hills Estates, Inc., 261 Ga. 94, 401 S.E.2d 513 (1991).

Cited in Kingsley v. Fla. Rock Indus., Inc., 259 Ga. App. 207, 575 S.E.2d 921 (2002); Buckner v. Douglas County, 273 Ga. App. 765, 615 S.E.2d 850 (2005); Century Ctr. at Braselton, LLC v. Town of Braselton, 285 Ga. 380, 677 S.E.2d 106 (2009).

36-66-3. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this chapter, the term:

(1) "Local government" means any county or municipality which exercises zoning power within its territorial boundaries.

(2) "Territorial boundaries" means, in the case of counties, the unincorporated areas thereof and any area defined in paragraph (5.1) of Code Section 36-70-2, and, in the case of municipalities, the area lying within the corporate limits thereof except any area defined in paragraph (5.1) of Code Section 36-70-2.

(3) "Zoning" means the power of local governments to provide within their respective territorial boundaries for the zoning or districting of property for various uses and the prohibition of other or different uses within such zones or districts and for the regulation of development and the improvement of real estate within such zones or districts in accordance with the uses of property for which such zones or districts were established.

(4) "Zoning decision" means final legislative action by a local government which results in:

(A) The adoption of a zoning ordinance;

(B) The adoption of an amendment to a zoning ordinance which changes the text of the zoning ordinance;

(C) The adoption of an amendment to a zoning ordinance which rezones property from one zoning classification to another;

(D) The adoption of an amendment to a zoning ordinance by a municipal local government which zones property to be annexed into the municipality; or

(E) The grant of a permit relating to a special use of property.

(5) "Zoning ordinance" means an ordinance or resolution of a local government establishing procedures and zones or districts within its respective territorial boundaries which regulate the uses and development standards of property within such zones or districts. The term also includes the zoning map adopted in conjunction with a zoning ordinance which shows the zones and districts and zoning classifications of property therein.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66-3, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1139, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 806, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1009, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1567, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1391, § 1.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1985, the definitions were alphabetized.

Law reviews. - For review of 1998 legislation relating to local government, see 15 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 194 (1998). For survey article on real property law, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 193 (2015). For annual survey on zoning and land use law, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 301 (2018).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

"Zoning decision" construed. - Both passage and rescission of a text amendment change the text of the zoning ordinance. Both actions fit squarely within the statutory definition of a "zoning decision." Atlanta Bio-Med, Inc. v. DeKalb County, 261 Ga. 594, 408 S.E.2d 100 (1991).

Clause in a lease agreement between a city and the city's solid waste treatment provider which might require a future amendment to a zoning ordinance did not constitute a zoning decision. Grove v. Sugar Hill Inv. Assocs., 219 Ga. App. 781, 466 S.E.2d 901 (1995).

Since a real estate developer had neither concluded the purchase of property or made substantial expenditures in reliance upon the probable issuance of a building permit until after the county amended its zoning ordinance to the detriment of the developer, the developer did not acquire a vested right to develop the property in question in conformity with the old ordinance; the county board of commissioner's letter to the developer amounted to an agreement to amend the ordinance and, thus, invoked the notice and hearing requirements under Georgia's Zoning Procedures Law, O.C.G.A. § 36-66-1 et seq. Buckner v. Douglas County, 273 Ga. App. 765, 615 S.E.2d 850 (2005).

Letter from a county to a developer advising that proposals would be considered under an amended ordinance limiting the development of private sewer systems was not a "decision" of the county for purposes of triggering the 30-day period to appeal under O.C.G.A. § 5-3-20; therefore, the developer's claim of inverse condemnation never ripened. Mortgage Alliance Corp. v. Pickens County, 294 Ga. 212, 751 S.E.2d 51 (2013).

"Zoning ordinance". - Commonly understood definition of "zoning ordinance" would encompass all those legislative acts that the Georgia's Zoning Procedures Law (ZPL), O.C.G.A. § 36-66-1 et seq., defines as "zoning decisions" under O.C.G.A. § 36-66-3(4); thus, the DeKalb County Organizational Act and the ZPL are consistent with one another because both distinguish between comprehensive zoning ordinances and all other zoning ordinances. Jester v. Red Alligator, LLC, 344 Ga. App. 15, 806 S.E.2d 920 (2017), cert. denied, 2018 Ga. LEXIS 479 (Ga. 2018).

Zoning map properly incorporated by reference. - County zoning ordinance properly incorporated by reference an official zoning map as the board of commissioners had a zoning map before the commissioners when the commissioners considered the ordinance, the zoning map was in existence when a limited liability limited partnership (LLLP) bought the property and that map was kept in the zoning administrator's office, the new zoning administrator's uncertainty about which of two maps was the official map did not render the entire zoning ordinance invalid, and it was clear that the LLLP's land was not zoned for a landfill. Mid-Georgia Envtl. Mgmt. Group, L.L.L.P. v. Meriwether County, 277 Ga. 670, 594 S.E.2d 344 (2004).

Sign ordinances were subject to the Zoning Procedures Law (ZPL), O.C.G.A. § 36-66-1 et seq., when the ordinances were drafted in such a manner as to regulate the uses and development standards of property, i.e., signs, by means of zones or districts; if the city's sign ordinance was read as a whole, it was clear that the ordinance divided the city into districts and regulated the uses of signs relative to the districts in which the signs were located and, accordingly, was subject to the ZPL. City of Walnut Grove v. Questco, Ltd., 275 Ga. 266, 564 S.E.2d 445 (2002).

Failure to establish standing. - Dismissal of the appellants' petition for a writ of certiorari challenging the grant of a special use permit to the appellees was upheld because the appellants only alleged generally that the art farm would create noise, light, and traffic, and that it would decrease property values, without alleging how those effects would harm the appellants differently than other property owners in the area. Davis v. Rockdale Art Farm, Inc., 354 Ga. App. 82, 840 S.E.2d 160 (2020).

Adult ordinance was not a "zoning ordinance" even though the ordinance placed certain limitations on locations available to an adult business and established certain minimum lot sizes and road frontages; rather than regulating general uses of land, the adult ordinance regulated a particular type of activity - adult entertainment; as such, it was not a zoning ordinance and was not subject to the hearing requirements established under the Zoning Procedures Law, O.C.G.A. § 36-66-1 et seq. Artistic Entm't, Inc. v. City of Warner Robins, 331 F.3d 1196 (11th Cir. 2003), cert. denied, 541 U.S. 988, 124 S. Ct. 2017, 158 L. Ed. 2d 491 (2004).

Flood ordinances in question did not classify property into separate districts, instead, the ordinances applied to all property in the county subject to a specified physical phenomenon, specifically, periodic flooding; thus, the ordinances were not zoning ordinances subject to the notice requirements of the Zoning Procedures Law, O.C.G.A. § 36-66-1 et seq., and were not invalid for failure to comply with that law. Union County v. CGP, Inc., 277 Ga. 349, 589 S.E.2d 240 (2003).

Overlay zoning ordinances. - With regard to the landowners' action against a town and the town's officials alleging the unconstitutionality and invalidity of an overlay zoning district, the trial court erred by denying the landowners' motion for partial summary judgment with regard to the landowners' claim that the town did not have any legal authority to impose the requirements of the overlay zoning ordinance for right-of-way improvements on the state route abutting the property since the property at issue was outside the territorial boundaries of the town. Therefore, the requirements of the overlay zoning ordinance were invalid as to the property since the town had no zoning authority over the property. Century Ctr. at Braselton, LLC v. Town of Braselton, 285 Ga. 380, 677 S.E.2d 106 (2009).

Establishment of copy of zoning law. - Application of former O.C.G.A. § 24-8-1 (see now O.C.G.A. § 24-11-2) in a county's action to establish a copy of a zoning ordinance that had been lost did not violate the Zoning Procedures Law (ZPL), O.C.G.A. § 36-66-1 et seq., because the trial court's decree did not have the effect of either adopting or amending any zoning ordinance; because it did not constitute final legislative action by a local government resulting in such adoption or amendment, the decree was not a "zoning decision" to which the ZPL applied, O.C.G.A. § 36-66-3(4). East Georgia Land & Dev. Co. v. Baker, 286 Ga. 551, 690 S.E.2d 145 (2010).

Not a zoning ordinance. - Trial court did not err in determining that the Zoning Procedures Law, O.C.G.A. § 36-66-1 et seq., did not apply to City of Forest Park, Ga., Ordinance § 9-8-45 because the ordinance regulated businesses selling merchandise in a certain manner, and that the ordinance regulated businesses and included a distance restriction in its regulation of merchandise display did not render it a "zoning ordinance;" the passage of the ordinance was not a "zoning decision" as defined by O.C.G.A. § 36-66-3(4), and the ordinance was not a "zoning ordinance" as defined by § 36-66-3(5). Braley v. City of Forest Park, 286 Ga. 760, 692 S.E.2d 595 (2010).

Notice requirement in seeking conditional use permit. - As a county's notice of the public hearing on a neighbor's request for a conditional use permit failed to comply with O.C.G.A. § 36-66-4(a) because the notice was published 46, not 45, days before the hearing, the county's approval of the neighbor's request was invalid. C & H Dev., LLC v. Franklin County, 294 Ga. App. 792, 670 S.E.2d 491 (2008).

Reference to "legislative" action not determinative. - Because a decision denying a conditional use permit required the zoning board to determine the facts and apply the ordinance's legal standards to them, which was a decision-making process akin to a judicial act, the decision was reviewable by certiorari under O.C.G.A. § 5-4-1(a); the owner's failure to file a certiorari petition barred the owner's claims. O.C.G.A. § 36-66-3(4)(E)'s reference to "legislative" action was not determinative. Riverdale Land Group, LLC v. Clayton County, 354 Ga. App. 1, 840 S.E.2d 132 (2020).

Decision on special use permit as quasi-legislative or quasi-judicial. - Decision by a county board to grant a special use permit was a quasi-judicial decision because the process involved determining the facts and applying the county ordinance's legal standards to the permits, which was akin to a judicial act; the applicant therefore waived the applicant's challenge to two property owners' standing by failing to object before the board. O.C.G.A. § 36-66-3(4)(E) did not apply or compel the conclusion that the board of commissioner's decision was legislative. York v. Athens College of Ministry, Inc., 348 Ga. App. 58, 821 S.E.2d 120 (2018).

Cited in Fairfax MK, Inc. v. City of Clarkston, 274 Ga. 520, 555 S.E.2d 722 (2001); Kingsley v. Fla. Rock Indus., Inc., 259 Ga. App. 207, 575 S.E.2d 921 (2002).

36-66-4. Hearings on proposed zoning decisions; notice of hearing; nongovernmental initiated actions; reconsideration of defeated actions; procedure on zoning for property annexed into municipality.

Statute text

(a) A local government taking action resulting in a zoning decision shall provide for a hearing on the proposed action. At least 15 but not more than 45 days prior to the date of the hearing, the local government shall cause to be published within a newspaper of general circulation within the territorial boundaries of the local government a notice of the hearing. The notice shall state the time, place, and purpose of the hearing.

(b) If a zoning decision of a local government is for the rezoning of property and the rezoning is initiated by a party other than the local government, then:

(1) The notice, in addition to the requirements of subsection (a) of this Code section, shall include the location of the property, the present zoning classification of the property, and the proposed zoning classification of the property; and

(2) A sign containing information required by local ordinance or resolution shall be placed in a conspicuous location on the property not less than 15 days prior to the date of the hearing.

(c) If the zoning decision of a local government is for the rezoning of property and the amendment to the zoning ordinance to accomplish the rezoning is defeated by the local government, then the same property may not again be considered for rezoning until the expiration of at least six months immediately following the defeat of the rezoning by the local government.

(d) If the zoning is for property to be annexed into a municipality, then:

(1) Such municipal local government shall complete the procedures required by this chapter for such zoning, except for the final vote of the municipal governing authority, prior to adoption of the annexation ordinance or resolution or the effective date of any local Act but no sooner than the date the notice of the proposed annexation is provided to the governing authority of the county as required under Code Section 36-36-6;

(2) The hearing required by subsection (a) of this Code section shall be conducted prior to the annexation of the subject property into the municipality;

(3) In addition to the other notice requirements of this Code section, the municipality shall cause to be published within a newspaper of general circulation within the territorial boundaries of the county wherein the property to be annexed is located a notice of the hearing as required under the provisions of subsection (a) or (b), as applicable, of this Code section and shall place a sign on the property when required by subsection (b) of this Code section; and

(4) The zoning classification approved by the municipality following the hearing required by this Code section shall become effective on the later of:

(A) The date the zoning is approved by the municipality;

(B) The date that the annexation becomes effective pursuant to Code Section 36-36-2; or

(C) Where a county has interposed an objection pursuant to Code Section 36-36-11, the date provided for in paragraph (8) of subsection (c) of said Code section.

(e) A qualified municipality into which property has been annexed may provide, by the adoption of a zoning ordinance, that all annexed property shall be zoned by the municipality, without further action, for the same use for which that property was zoned immediately prior to such annexation. A qualified county which includes property which has been deannexed by a municipality may provide, by the adoption of a zoning ordinance, that all deannexed property shall be zoned by the county, without further action, for the same use for which that property was zoned immediately prior to such deannexation. A municipality shall be a qualified municipality only if the municipality and the county in which is located the property annexed into such municipality have a common zoning ordinance with respect to zoning classifications. A county shall be a qualified county only if that county and the municipality in which was located the property deannexed have a common zoning ordinance with respect to zoning classifications. A zoning ordinance authorized by this subsection shall be adopted in compliance with the other provisions of this chapter. The operation of such ordinance to zone property which is annexed or deannexed shall not require any further action by the adopting municipality, adopting county, or owner of the property annexed or deannexed. Property which is zoned pursuant to this subsection may have such zoning classification changed upon compliance with the other provisions of this chapter.

(f) When a proposed zoning decision relates to or will allow the location or relocation of a halfway house, drug rehabilitation center, or other facility for treatment of drug dependency, a public hearing shall be held on the proposed action. Such public hearing shall be held at least six months and not more than nine months prior to the date of final action on the zoning decision. The hearing required by this subsection shall be in addition to any hearing required under subsection (a) of this Code section. The local government shall give notice of such hearing by:

(1) Posting notice on the affected premises in the manner prescribed by subsection (b) of this Code section; and

(2) Publishing in a newspaper of general circulation within the territorial boundaries of the local government a notice of the hearing at least 15 days and not more than 45 days prior to the date of the hearing.

Both the posted notice and the published notice shall include a prominent statement that the proposed zoning decision relates to or will allow the location or relocation of a halfway house, drug rehabilitation center, or other facility for treatment of drug dependency. The published notice shall be at least six column inches in size and shall not be located in the classified advertising section of the newspaper.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66-4, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1139, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1009, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 856, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1392, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 69, § 19; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 36/HB 942.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2004, p. 69, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act shall be known and may be cited as the 'State and Local Taxation, Financing, and Service Delivery Revision Act of 2004.'"

Law reviews. - For article surveying real property law in 1984-1985, see 37 Mercer L. Rev. 343 (1985). For article on 2004 amendment of this Code section, see 21 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 226 (2004). For annual survey on zoning and land use law, see 61 Mercer L. Rev. 427 (2009). For annual survey on real property, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 251 (2017). For annual survey on zoning and land use law, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 371 (2017).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Subsection (b) mandatory for text amendment of general application. - Procedures described in subsection (b) of O.C.G.A. § 36-66-4 must be followed when passing or rescinding a text amendment of general application. Atlanta Bio-Med, Inc. v. DeKalb County, 261 Ga. 594, 408 S.E.2d 100 (1991).

What constitutes "rezoning decision." - Text amendment having general application is not a "rezoning decision" for purposes of the procedures required under subsection (b) of O.C.G.A. § 36-66-4. Atlanta Bio-Med, Inc. v. DeKalb County, 261 Ga. 594, 408 S.E.2d 100 (1991).

Although O.C.G.A. § 36-66-4 requires only one hearing during the continuous course of a zoning matter before the local government, when a court found a first zoning decision unconstitutional and remanded the matter with direction to rezone, the zoning authority was required to hold a hearing. City of Cumming v. Realty Dev. Corp., 268 Ga. 461, 491 S.E.2d 60 (1997).

Adult ordinance was not a "zoning ordinance" even though the ordinance placed certain limitations on locations available to an adult business and established certain minimum lot sizes and road frontages; rather than regulating general uses of land, the adult ordinance regulated a particular type of activity - adult entertainment; as such, it was not a zoning ordinance and was not subject to the hearing requirements established under the Zoning Procedures Law, O.C.G.A. § 36-66-1 et seq. Artistic Entm't, Inc. v. City of Warner Robins, 331 F.3d 1196 (11th Cir. 2003), cert. denied, 541 U.S. 988, 124 S. Ct. 2017, 158 L. Ed. 2d 491 (2004).

Notice. - County's failure to comply with the notice provisions of subsection (a) of O.C.G.A. § 36-66-4 invalidated the subject zoning action. McClure v. Davidson, 258 Ga. 706, 373 S.E.2d 617 (1988).

Since a real estate developer had neither concluded the purchase of property or made substantial expenditures in reliance upon the probable issuance of a building permit until after the county amended the county's zoning ordinance to the detriment of the developer, the developer did not acquire a vested right to develop the property in question in conformity with the old ordinance; the county board of commissioner's letter to the developer amounted to an agreement to amend the ordinance and, thus, invoked the notice and hearing requirements under Georgia's Zoning Procedures Law, O.C.G.A. § 36-66-1 et seq. Buckner v. Douglas County, 273 Ga. App. 765, 615 S.E.2d 850 (2005).

As a county's notice of the public hearing on a neighbor's request for a conditional use permit failed to comply with O.C.G.A. § 36-66-4(a) because the notice was published 46, not 45, days before the hearing, the county's approval of the neighbor's request was invalid. C & H Dev., LLC v. Franklin County, 294 Ga. App. 792, 670 S.E.2d 491 (2008).

Hearing requirement not met. - Hearing before the Planning Commission did not satisfy the requirements of the Zoning Procedures Law, O.C.G.A. § 36-66-1 et seq., because the only record of the hearing was a one-page memorandum disclosing that the Commission heard testimony from the applicant and considerable objections from the surrounding neighborhood, but the memorandum did not disclose the nature of the objections and, thus, did not inform the County Board of Commissioners in a meaningful way of what happened at the hearing. Hoechstetter v. Pickens County, 303 Ga. 786, 815 S.E.2d 50 (2018).

Annexation voided when procedures not followed. - Defendants attempt to annex certain properties into the corporate limits of the city and establish a new zoning district was voided because the procedural requirements of O.C.G.A § 36-36-21 and subsections (a) and (b) of O.C.G.A. § 36-66-4 were not met. City of Byron v. Betancourt, 242 Ga. App. 71, 528 S.E.2d 841 (2000).

Applicability to new permitted use. - Procedures described in subsection (b) of O.C.G.A. § 36-66-4 and former O.C.G.A. § 36-67-5 did not apply to the enactment of a zoning ordinance text amendment that allowed a new permitted use. Atlanta Bio-Med, Inc. v. DeKalb County, 261 Ga. 594, 408 S.E.2d 100 (1991).

Zoning map properly incorporated by reference. - County zoning ordinance properly incorporated by reference an official zoning map as the board of commissioners had a zoning map before the commissioners when the commissioners considered the ordinance, the zoning map was in existence when a limited liability limited partnership (LLLP) bought the property and that map was kept in the zoning administrator's office, the new zoning administrator's uncertainty about which of two maps was the official map did not render the entire zoning ordinance invalid, and it was clear that the LLLP's land was not zoned for a landfill. Mid-Georgia Envtl. Mgmt. Group, L.L.L.P. v. Meriwether County, 277 Ga. 670, 594 S.E.2d 344 (2004).

Adequate state remedy for procedural irregularities in adoption of new zoning ordinances. - Trial court did not err in granting the city's motion for judgment on the pleadings on the plaintiffs' procedural due process claims as Georgia's Zoning Procedures Law (ZPL), O.C.G.A. § 36-66-1 et seq., provided the plaintiffs with an adequate state remedy for alleged procedural irregularities committed by the city in the adoption of a new zoning ordinance because the ZPL required local governments to provide property owners with a meaningful opportunity to be heard before enacting a zoning ordinance, not simply mere notice of a hearing, as the ZPL required that a local government conduct a public hearing on a proposed zoning ordinance before its adoption; and, if no public hearing was held, aggrieved property owners could sue to have the ordinance declared invalid. Schumacher v. City of Roswell, 344 Ga. App. 135, 809 S.E.2d 262 (2017).

Cited in City of Roswell v. Outdoor Sys., Inc., 274 Ga. 130, 549 S.E.2d 90 (2001); Edwards v. City of Warner Robins, 302 Ga. 381, 807 S.E.2d 438 (2017).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Reconsideration after tie vote. - Tie vote on consideration of a zoning proposal by a county board was not a "defeat" of the proposal so as to bar the proposal's reconsideration within six months. 1996 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U96-16.

36-66-5. Adoption of hearing policies and procedures and standards for exercise of zoning power.

Statute text

(a) Local governments shall adopt policies and procedures which govern calling and conducting hearings required by Code Section 36-66-4, and printed copies of such policies and procedures shall be available for distribution to the general public. Such policies and procedures shall specify a minimum time period at hearings on proposed zoning decisions for presentation of data, evidence, and opinion by proponents of each zoning decision and an equal minimum time period for presentation by opponents of each proposed zoning decision, such minimum time period to be no less than ten minutes per side.

(b) In addition to policies and procedures required by subsection (a) of this Code section, each local government shall adopt standards governing the exercise of the zoning power, and such standards may include any factors which the local government finds relevant in balancing the interest in promoting the public health, safety, morality, or general welfare against the right to the unrestricted use of property. Such standards shall be printed and copies thereof shall be available for distribution to the general public.

(c) The policies and procedures required by subsection (a) of this Code section and the adoption of standards required by subsection (b) of this Code section may be included in and adopted as part of the zoning ordinance. Prior to the adoption of any zoning ordinance enacted on or after January 1, 1986, a local government shall conduct a public hearing on a proposed action which may be advertised and held concurrent with the hearing required by subsection (a) of Code Section 36-66-4 for the adoption of a zoning ordinance. The provisions of subsection (a) of Code Section 36-66-4 relating to notices of public hearings for the purposes of that subsection shall also apply to public hearings required by this subsection.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66-5, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1139, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 806, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 317, § 1.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For comment, "Judicial Review of Zoning Ordinances in Georgia: The Court's Role in Land Use Planning," see 41 Mercer L. Rev. 1469 (1990).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Notice of hearing. - County Planning Commission had the authority to conduct public hearings on applications for conditional use permits; the commission's notice of this hearing complied with O.C.G.A. § 36-66-4(a), Pickens County Code of Ordinances § 67-15, Appendix A, §§ 9.0, 14, and an additional notice was not required when the Board of Commissioners voted on the Planning Commission's recommendation.

Cited in Pinnell v. Kight, 245 Ga. App. 299, 537 S.E.2d 170 (2000).

36-66-6. Investigations and recommendations of planning department regarding land near military installation.

Statute text

(a) In any local government which has established a planning department or other similar agency charged with the duty of reviewing zoning proposals, such planning department or other agency shall with respect to each proposed zoning decision involving land that is adjacent to or within 3,000 feet of any military base or military installation or within the 3,000 foot Clear Zone and Accident Prevention Zones Numbers I and II as prescribed in the definition of an Air Installation Compatible Use Zone of a military airport investigate and make a recommendation with respect to each of the matters enumerated in subsection (b) of this Code section, in addition to any other duties with which the planning department or agency is charged by the local government. The planning department or other agency shall request from the commander of such military base, military installation, or military airport a written recommendation and supporting facts relating to the use of the land being considered in the proposed zoning decision at least 30 days prior to the hearing required by subsection (a) of Code Section 36-66-4. If the base commander does not submit a response to such request by the date of the public hearing, there shall be a presumption that the proposed zoning decision will not have any adverse effect relative to the matters specified in subsection (b) of this Code section. Any such information provided shall become a part of the public record.
